Illinois, session 104th, HB2741.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Funds Investment Act is amended by 5changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 235/2)  (from Ch. 85, par. 902)7    Sec. 2. Authorized investments. 8    (a) Any public agency may invest any public funds as 9follows:10        (1) in bonds, notes, certificates of indebtedness, 11    treasury bills or other securities now or hereafter 12    issued, which are guaranteed by the full faith and credit 13    of the United States of America as to principal and 14    interest;15        (2) in bonds, notes, debentures, or other similar 16    obligations of the United States of America, its agencies, 17    and its instrumentalities;18        (3) in interest-bearing savings accounts, 19    interest-bearing certificates of deposit or 20    interest-bearing time deposits or any other investments 21    constituting direct obligations of any bank as defined by 22    the Illinois Banking Act;23        (4) in short-term obligations of corporations   HB2741- 2 -LRB104 08315 HLH 18366 b1    organized in the United States with assets exceeding 2    $500,000,000 if (i) such obligations are rated at the time 3    of purchase at one of the 3 highest classifications 4    established by at least 2 standard rating services and 5    which mature not later than 270 days from the date of 6    purchase, (ii) such purchases do not exceed 10% of the 7    corporation's outstanding obligations, and (iii) no more 8    than one-third of the public agency's funds may be 9    invested in short-term obligations of corporations under 10    this paragraph (4);11        (4.5) in obligations of corporations organized in the 12    United States with assets exceeding $500,000,000 if (i) 13    such obligations are rated at the time of purchase at one 14    of the 3 highest classifications established by at least 2 15    standard rating services and which mature more than 270 16    days but less than 10 years from the date of purchase, (ii) 17    such purchases do not exceed 10% of the corporation's 18    outstanding obligations, and (iii) no more than one-third 19    of the public agency's funds may be invested in 20    obligations of corporations under this paragraph (4.5); or 21        (5) in money market mutual funds registered under the 22    Investment Company Act of 1940, provided that the 23    portfolio of any such money market mutual fund is limited 24    to obligations described in paragraph (1) or (2) of this 25    subsection and to agreements to repurchase such 26    obligations.  HB2741- 3 -LRB104 08315 HLH 18366 b1        (6) in any security that matures or that may be 2    tendered for purchase at the option of the holder within 3    not more than 7 years of the date on which it is acquired 4    and that has the highest rating category (AAA) or the 5    second highest rating category (AA) assigned by Standard & 6    Poor's Corporation, Moody's Investors' Services, or other 7    similar nationally recognized statistical rating 8    organization. 9    (a-1) In addition to any other investments authorized 10under this Act, a municipality, park district, forest preserve 11district, conservation district, county, or other governmental 12unit may invest its public funds in interest bearing bonds of 13any county, township, city, village, incorporated town, 14municipal corporation, or school district, of the State of 15Illinois, of any other state, or of any political subdivision 16or agency of the State of Illinois or of any other state, 17whether the interest earned thereon is taxable or tax-exempt 18under federal law. The bonds shall be registered in the name of 19the municipality, park district, forest preserve district, 20conservation district, county, or other governmental unit, or 21held under a custodial agreement at a bank. The bonds shall be 22rated at the time of purchase within the 4 highest general 23classifications established by a rating service of nationally 24recognized expertise in rating bonds of states and their 25political subdivisions.26    (b) Investments may be made only in banks which are   HB2741- 4 -LRB104 08315 HLH 18366 b1insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. Any 2public agency may invest any public funds in short term 3discount obligations of the Federal National Mortgage 4Association or in shares or other forms of securities legally 5issuable by savings banks or savings and loan associations 6incorporated under the laws of this State or any other state or 7under the laws of the United States. Investments may be made 8only in those savings banks or savings and loan associations 9the shares, or investment certificates of which are insured by 10the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. Any such securities 11may be purchased at the offering or market price thereof at the 12time of such purchase. All such securities so purchased shall 13mature or be redeemable on a date or dates prior to the time 14when, in the judgment of such governing authority, the public 15funds so invested will be required for expenditure by such 16public agency or its governing authority. The expressed 17judgment of any such governing authority as to the time when 18any public funds will be required for expenditure or be 19redeemable is final and conclusive. Any public agency may 20invest any public funds in dividend-bearing share accounts, 21share certificate accounts or class of share accounts of a 22credit union chartered under the laws of this State or the laws 23of the United States; provided, however, the principal office 24of any such credit union must be located within the State of 25Illinois. Investments may be made only in those credit unions 26the accounts of which are insured by applicable law.  HB2741- 5 -LRB104 08315 HLH 18366 b1    (c) For purposes of this Section, the term "agencies of 2the United States of America" includes: (i) the federal land 3banks, federal intermediate credit banks, banks for 4cooperative, federal farm credit banks, or any other entity 5authorized to issue debt obligations under the Farm Credit Act 6of 1971 (12 U.S.C. 2001 et seq.) and Acts amendatory thereto; 7(ii) the federal home loan banks and the federal home loan 8mortgage corporation; and (iii) any other agency created by 9Act of Congress.10    (d) Except for pecuniary interests permitted under 11subsection (f) of Section 3-14-4 of the Illinois Municipal 12Code or under Section 3.2 of the Public Officer Prohibited 13Practices Act, no person acting as treasurer or financial 14officer or who is employed in any similar capacity by or for a 15public agency may do any of the following:16        (1) have any interest, directly or indirectly, in any 17    investments in which the agency is authorized to invest.18        (2) have any interest, directly or indirectly, in the 19    sellers, sponsors, or managers of those investments.20        (3) receive, in any manner, compensation of any kind 21    from any investments in which the agency is authorized to 22    invest.23    (e) Any public agency may also invest any public funds in a 24Public Treasurers' Investment Pool created under Section 17 of 25the State Treasurer Act. Any public agency may also invest any 26public funds in a fund managed, operated, and administered by   HB2741- 6 -LRB104 08315 HLH 18366 b1a bank, subsidiary of a bank, or subsidiary of a bank holding 2company or use the services of such an entity to hold and 3invest or advise regarding the investment of any public funds.4    (f) To the extent a public agency has custody of funds not 5owned by it or another public agency and does not otherwise 6have authority to invest such funds, the public agency may 7invest such funds as if they were its own. Such funds must be 8released to the appropriate person at the earliest reasonable 9time, but in no case exceeding 31 days, after the private 10person becomes entitled to the receipt of them. All earnings 11accruing on any investments or deposits made pursuant to the 12provisions of this Act shall be credited to the public agency 13by or for which such investments or deposits were made, except 14as provided otherwise in Section 4.1 of the State Finance Act 15or the Local Governmental Tax Collection Act, and except where 16by specific statutory provisions such earnings are directed to 17be credited to and paid to a particular fund.18    (g) A public agency may purchase or invest in repurchase 19agreements of government securities having the meaning set out 20in the Government Securities Act of 1986, as now or hereafter 21amended or succeeded, subject to the provisions of said Act 22and the regulations issued thereunder. The government 23securities, unless registered or inscribed in the name of the 24public agency, shall be purchased through banks or trust 25companies authorized to do business in the State of Illinois.26    (h) Except for repurchase agreements of government   HB2741- 7 -LRB104 08315 HLH 18366 b1securities which are subject to the Government Securities Act 2of 1986, as now or hereafter amended or succeeded, no public 3agency may purchase or invest in instruments which constitute 4repurchase agreements, and no financial institution may enter 5into such an agreement with or on behalf of any public agency 6unless the instrument and the transaction meet the following 7requirements:8        (1) The securities, unless registered or inscribed in 9    the name of the public agency, are purchased through banks 10    or trust companies authorized to do business in the State 11    of Illinois.12        (2) An authorized public officer after ascertaining 13    which firm will give the most favorable rate of interest, 14    directs the custodial bank to "purchase" specified 15    securities from a designated institution. The "custodial 16    bank" is the bank or trust company, or agency of 17    government, which acts for the public agency in connection 18    with repurchase agreements involving the investment of 19    funds by the public agency. The State Treasurer may act as 20    custodial bank for public agencies executing repurchase 21    agreements. To the extent the Treasurer acts in this 22    capacity, he is hereby authorized to pass through to such 23    public agencies any charges assessed by the Federal 24    Reserve Bank.25        (3) A custodial bank must be a member bank of the 26    Federal Reserve System or maintain accounts with member   HB2741- 8 -LRB104 08315 HLH 18366 b1    banks. All transfers of book-entry securities must be 2    accomplished on a Reserve Bank's computer records through 3    a member bank of the Federal Reserve System. These 4    securities must be credited to the public agency on the 5    records of the custodial bank and the transaction must be 6    confirmed in writing to the public agency by the custodial 7    bank.8        (4) Trading partners shall be limited to banks or 9    trust companies authorized to do business in the State of 10    Illinois or to registered primary reporting dealers.11        (5) The security interest must be perfected.12        (6) The public agency enters into a written master 13    repurchase agreement which outlines the basic 14    responsibilities and liabilities of both buyer and seller.15        (7) Agreements shall be for periods of 330 days or 16    less.17        (8) The authorized public officer of the public agency 18    informs the custodial bank in writing of the maturity 19    details of the repurchase agreement.20        (9) The custodial bank must take delivery of and 21    maintain the securities in its custody for the account of 22    the public agency and confirm the transaction in writing 23    to the public agency. The Custodial Undertaking shall 24    provide that the custodian takes possession of the 25    securities exclusively for the public agency; that the 26    securities are free of any claims against the trading   HB2741- 9 -LRB104 08315 HLH 18366 b1    partner; and any claims by the custodian are subordinate 2    to the public agency's claims to rights to those 3    securities.4        (10) The obligations purchased by a public agency may 5    only be sold or presented for redemption or payment by the 6    fiscal agent bank or trust company holding the obligations 7    upon the written instruction of the public agency or 8    officer authorized to make such investments.9        (11) The custodial bank shall be liable to the public 10    agency for any monetary loss suffered by the public agency 11    due to the failure of the custodial bank to take and 12    maintain possession of such securities.13    (i) Notwithstanding the foregoing restrictions on 14investment in instruments constituting repurchase agreements 15the Illinois Housing Development Authority may invest in, and 16any financial institution with capital of at least 17$250,000,000 may act as custodian for, instruments that 18constitute repurchase agreements, provided that the Illinois 19Housing Development Authority, in making each such investment, 20complies with the safety and soundness guidelines for engaging 21in repurchase transactions applicable to federally insured 22banks, savings banks, savings and loan associations or other 23depository institutions as set forth in the Federal Financial 24Institutions Examination Council Policy Statement Regarding 25Repurchase Agreements and any regulations issued, or which may 26be issued by the supervisory federal authority pertaining   HB2741- 10 -LRB104 08315 HLH 18366 b1thereto and any amendments thereto; provided further that the 2securities shall be either (i) direct general obligations of, 3or obligations the payment of the principal of and/or interest 4on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States 5of America or (ii) any obligations of any agency, corporation 6or subsidiary thereof controlled or supervised by and acting 7as an instrumentality of the United States Government pursuant 8to authority granted by the Congress of the United States and 9provided further that the security interest must be perfected 10by either the Illinois Housing Development Authority, its 11custodian or its agent receiving possession of the securities 12either physically or transferred through a nationally 13recognized book entry system.14    (j) In addition to all other investments authorized under 15this Section, a community college district may invest public 16funds in any mutual funds that invest primarily in corporate 17investment grade or global government short term bonds. 18Purchases of mutual funds that invest primarily in global 19government short term bonds shall be limited to funds with 20assets of at least $100 million and that are rated at the time 21of purchase as one of the 10 highest classifications 22established by a recognized rating service. The investments 23shall be subject to approval by the local community college 24board of trustees. Each community college board of trustees 25shall develop a policy regarding the percentage of the 26college's investment portfolio that can be invested in such   HB2741- 11 -LRB104 08315 HLH 18366 b1funds.2    (k) In addition to all other investments authorized under 3this Section, a public agency may adopt an ordinance or 4resolution to allow for investment of public funds in other 5instruments not specifically listed in this Section provided 6that those investments comply with (i) any other law that 7authorizes public agencies to invest funds and (ii) the 8investment policy adopted by the public agency under Section 92.5 of this Act. 10    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to authorize an 11intergovernmental risk management entity to accept the deposit 12of public funds except for risk management purposes.13(Source: P.A. 102-285, eff. 8-6-21; 103-880, eff. 1-1-25.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.